Virginia statutes. Title 21. Drainage, Soil Conservation, Sanitation and Public Facilities Districts.
Chapter 7. Public Facilities District Laws.

§ 21-427.
Public facilities district law for certain counties.

Chapter 93 of the Acts of 1946, as amended by Chapter 363 of Acts 1952, relating to public facilities district law applicable in counties having a population of between 500 and 1,000 inhabitants per square mile and a land area of between thirty and seventy square miles, or of any county having a land area of between thirty and eighty-five square miles, is continued in effect.

Cross references.

As to creation, enlargement, contraction, etc., of sanitary districts, see §

15.2-858

.

Law Review.

For article, “Local Government Law in Virginia, 1870-1970,” see 4 U. Rich. L. Rev. 174 (1970).

For note, “Public Regulation of Water Quality in Virginia,” see 13 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 424 (1971).

§ 21-427.1.
City public facilities district law.

Chapter 414 of the Acts of 1956, relating to public facilities district law applicable to cities having a population of more than 50,000 but less than 61,000 and a land area of less than seventy square miles but more than fifty square miles, is incorporated in this Code by this reference.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the 1956 act having assigned no number.